Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska8-309
Stock; withdrawal; limit; funds applicable.

At no time shall more than one-half of the unloaned funds in the treasury of the association and one-half of the accumulations thereto be applicable to the demands of the withdrawing shareholders without the consent by resolution of the board of directors. If there is delay in meeting payment to withdrawing members due to insufficient funds applicable to such purpose, such members shall be paid, and their stock thus repurchased retired, in the order of the filing of their withdrawal notices as funds applicable therefor are available.

Laws 1899, c. 17, § 3, p. 86;

R.S.1913, § 488;

Laws 1919, c. 190, tit. V, art. XIX, § 4, p. 725;

C.S.1922, § 8086;

C.S.1929, § 8-304;

Laws 1941, c. 12, § 1, p. 84;

C.S.Supp.,1941, § 8-304;

R.S.1943, § 8-309.